Ohio, session 136, SB470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.156 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.156. The bridge spanning the Cuyahoga river, located in Summit county and being a part of the highway known as state route number eight, shall be known as the "First Lieutenant Ronald Yale, USMC, Memorial Bridge." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers upon the bridge or its approaches indicating its name.